Vermont, session 2025-2026, H738.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 4353 is amended to read:
§ 4353. FEES
(a) The Commissioner may establish by rule any requirement the
Department needs to determine the applicable categories or exemptions for
licenses. The following license fees shall be paid annually to the Department
at the time of making the application according to the following schedules:
(1) Restaurants
I — Seating capacity of 0 to 25; $105.00
II — Seating capacity of 26 to 50; $180.00
III — Seating capacity of 51 to 100; $300.00
VT LEG #386674 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.738
2026 Page 2 of 2
IV — Seating capacity of 101 to 200; $385.00
V — Seating capacity of 201 to 599; $450.00
VI — Seating capacity 600 and over; $1,000.00
VII — Home Caterer; $155.00
VIII — Commercial Caterer; $260.00
IX — Limited Operations; $140.00
X — Fair Stand; $125.00; if operating for four or
more days per year; $230.00
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386674 v.1